Arkansas, session 2025, HB1281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-6-208(a), concerning required reporting
of contributions for candidates for school district, township, or municipal
office and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) Reports Required. Except as provided in subsection subsections
(d) and (e) of this section, each candidate for school district, township, or
municipal office, or a person acting in the candidate's behalf, shall:
(1)(A) For each year in which a candidate is not listed on a
ballot for election, file an annual report of all contributions received and
expenditures made during that year.
*SSS082*
02-04-2025 10:27:42 SSS082

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1281
(B) The annual report shall be filed no later than fifteen
(15) days after the end of the year;
(2) No later than seven (7) sixty (60) days prior to any
preferential primary election, runoff election, general election, school
election, or special election in which the candidate's name appears on the
ballot, file a preelection report of all contributions received and
expenditures made between the period covered by the previous report, if any,
and the period ten (10) days before the election. In case of a runoff
election, the report shall cover all contributions received and expenditures
made during that period of time that begins after the date of the election
from which the runoff arose and ends ten (10) days before the runoff election
date of the filing of the report;
(3) No later than thirty (30) days prior to any preferential
primary election, runoff election, general election, school election, or
special election in which the candidate's name appears on the ballot, file a
preelection report of all contributions received and expenditures made
between the period covered by the previous report, if any, and the date of
the filing of the report;
(3)(4) No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month
in which the candidate's name has appeared on the ballot in any preferential
primary election, runoff election, general election, school election, or
special election, or when only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular
office or position and no position or name of an unopposed candidate shall
appear on a ballot, file a final report of all contributions received and
expenditures made that have not been disclosed on reports previously required
to be filed. A final report is required regardless of whether a candidate has
received contributions or made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars
($500);
(4)(5) File supplemental reports of all contributions received
and expenditures made after the date of preparation of the final report. The
supplemental reports shall be filed within thirty (30) days after the receipt
of a contribution or the making of an expenditure;
(5) (6)(A) No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the
month in which the candidate has withdrawn, file a final report of all
contributions received and expenditures made that have not been disclosed on
reports previously required to be filed.
02-04-2025 10:27:42 SSS082

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1281
(B) If a candidate withdraws from the campaign, the
candidate shall notify the county clerk in writing of the withdrawal; and
(6)(7) If a candidate keeps remaining campaign funds after an
election, the candidate shall continue filing the reports required by this
subsection.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-6-208(d), concerning reports not required
for candidates for a county office and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of
1996, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Reports Not Required.
(1) A candidate who has not received contributions or made
expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) shall not be required
to file any preelection reports required under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section. In calculating the amount of contributions received or expenditures
made for purposes of this exception, the payment of the filing fee from the
candidate's personal funds shall not be considered as either a contribution
or an expenditure.
(2) The preelection reports referenced in subdivision (a)(1) of
this section are only required only for candidates with opponents in those
elections.
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-6-208, concerning reports not required for
candidates for a county officer and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1996,
is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(e) A candidate who has received contributions in excess of five
thousand dollars ($5,000) shall file a preelection report monthly under this
section.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-6-209(a), concerning required reporting
of contributions for candidates for a county office and resulting from
Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Reports Required. Except as provided in subsection subsections
(d) and (e) of this section, each candidate for county office or a person
acting in the candidate's behalf shall:
(1)(A) For each year in which a candidate is not listed on a
ballot for election, file an annual report of all contributions received and
expenditures made during that year.
02-04-2025 10:27:42 SSS082

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1281
(B) The annual report shall be filed no later than fifteen
(15) days after the end of the year;
(2) No later than seven (7) sixty (60) days prior to any preferential
primary election, runoff election, general election, or special election in
which the candidate's name appears on the ballot, file a preelection report
of all contributions received and expenditures made between the period
covered by the previous report, if any, and the period ten (10) days before
the election. In case of a runoff election, the report shall cover all
contributions received and expenditures made during that period of time that
begins after the date of the election from which the runoff arose and ends
ten (10) days before the runoff election date of the filing of the report;
(3) No later than thirty (30) days prior to any preferential
primary election, runoff election, general election, or special election in
which the candidate's name appears on the ballot, file a preelection report
of all contributions received and expenditures made between the period
covered by the previous report, if any, and the date of the filing of the
report;
(3)(4) No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month
in which the candidate's name has appeared on the ballot in any preferential
primary election, runoff election, general election, or special election, or
when only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular office or position and
no position or name of an unopposed candidate shall appear on a ballot, file
a final report of all contributions received and expenditures made that have
not been disclosed on reports previously required to be filed. A final report
is required regardless of whether a candidate has received contributions or
made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500);
(4)(5) File supplemental reports of all contributions received
and expenditures made after the date of preparation of the final report, and
the supplemental reports shall be filed within thirty (30) days after the
receipt of a contribution or the making of an expenditure;
(5) (6)(A) No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month
in which the candidate has withdrawn, a final report of all contributions
received and expenditures made that have not been disclosed on reports
previously required to be filed.
(B) If a candidate withdraws from the campaign, the
candidate shall notify the county clerk in writing of the withdrawal; and
02-04-2025 10:27:42 SSS082

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1281
(6)(7) If a candidate keeps remaining campaign funds after an
election, the candidate shall continue filing the reports required by this
subsection.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 7-6-209(d), concerning reports not required
for contributions of candidates for a county office and resulting from
Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Reports Not Required.
(1) A candidate who has not received contributions or made
expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) shall not be required
to file any preelection reports required under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section. In calculating the amount of contributions received or expenditures
made for purposes of this exception, the payment of the filing fee from the
candidate's personal funds shall not be considered as either a contribution
or an expenditure.
(2) The preelection reports referenced in subdivision (a)(1) of
this section are required only for candidates with opponents in those
elections.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 7-6-209, concerning reports not required
for contributions of candidates for a county office and resulting from
Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to add an additional subsection to read
as follows:
(e) A candidate who has received contributions in excess of five
thousand dollars ($5,000) shall file a preelection report monthly under this
section.
/s/McAlindon









02-04-2025 10:27:42 SSS082